Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.536] COVERAGE OF INHERITED METABOLIC DISEASES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Inherited metabolic disease" means a disease caused by an inherited abnormality of body chemistry that affects the individual's metabolism. new text end new text begin (c) "Low-protein modified food product" means a food product that is (1) specially formulated to have less than one gram of protein per serving, and (2) intended to be used under the direction of a physician for the dietary treatment of an inherited metabolic disease. Low-protein modified food product does not include a natural food that is naturally low in protein. new text end new text begin (d) "Medical food" means a food that is (1) intended for the dietary treatment of a disease or condition for which nutritional requirements are established by medical evaluation, and (2) formulated to be consumed or administered enterally under direction of a physician. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Required coverage. new text end new text begin A health plan must cover medically necessary treatment of inherited metabolic diseases, including but not limited to the purchase of medical foods and low-protein modified food products. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Coverage limitations. new text end new text begin A health plan must not impose on the coverage required under this section any limitation, including but not limited to any cost-sharing, utilization review, prior authorization, referral requirements, restrictions, or delays, that is not generally applicable to other coverage under the plan. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 77. new text end new text begin Inherited metabolic diseases. new text end new text begin (a) Medical assistance covers medically necessary treatment for inherited metabolic diseases, including but not limited to the purchase of medical foods and low-protein modified food products. Medical assistance must meet the requirements that otherwise apply to a health plan under section 62Q.536. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "inherited metabolic disease," "low-protein modified food product," and "medical food" have the meanings given in section 62Q.536. new text end